Maryland, session 2025, HB0621.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
10–109.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0621*

HOUSE BILL 621
(a) (1) Disclosure of expunged information about criminal charges in an
application, interview, or other means may not be required:
(i) by an employer or educational institution of a person who applies
for employment or admission; or
(ii) by a unit, official, or employee of the State or a political
subdivision of the State of a person who applies for a license, permit, registration, or
governmental service.
(2) A person need not refer to or give information concerning an expunged
charge when answering a question concerning:
(i) a criminal charge that did not result in a conviction; or
(ii) a conviction that the Governor pardoned.
(3) Refusal by a person to disclose information about criminal charges that
have been expunged may not be the sole reason for:
(i) an employer to discharge or refuse to hire the person; [or]
(ii) a unit, official, or employee of the State or a political subdivision
of the State to deny the person’s application FOR A LICENSE, PERMIT, REGISTRATION,
OR GOVERNMENTAL SERVICE; OR
(III) AN EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTION TO EXPEL OR REFUSE TO
ADMIT THE PERSON.
(b) (1) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on
conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding $1,000 or imprisonment not exceeding 1 year
or both for each violation.
(2) In addition to the penalties provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection,
an official or employee of the State or a political subdivision of the State who is convicted
under this section may be removed or dismissed from public service.
10–111.
The Maryland Judiciary Case Search AND THE MARYLAND ELECTRONIC
COURTS (MDEC) SYSTEM may not in any way refer to the existence of a criminal case in
which:
(1) possession of cannabis under § 5–601 of the Criminal Law Article is the
only charge in the case; and

HOUSE BILL 621 3
(2) the charge was disposed of before July 1, 2023.
10–112.
(a) In this section, “expunge” means to remove all references to a specified
criminal case from the Central Repository AND THE MARYLAND ELECTRONIC COURTS
(MDEC) SYSTEM.
(b) On or before July 1, 2024, the Department of Public Safety and Correctional
Services shall expunge all cases in which:
(1) possession of cannabis under § 5–601 of the Criminal Law Article is the
only charge in the case; and
(2) the charge was issued before July 1, 2023.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.